Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1634
Top of dam elevation, defined.

Top of dam elevation means the maximum design elevation for the top of the dam, including design freeboard allowances but excluding any allowance for settlement due to consolidation of foundation and embankment.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 34.